Utah statutes.
73-15-7.   Precipitation caused by authorized project not presumed to
constitute trespass or nuisance.
The mere dissemination of materials and substances into the atmosphere or
causing precipitation pursuant to an authorized cloud-seeding project shall
not give rise to any presumption that such use of the atmosphere or lands
constitutes trespass or involves an actionable or enjoinable public or private
nuisance.
